Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-905
Solar energy system, defined.

Solar energy system shall mean a complete design or assembly consisting of a solar energy collector, an energy storage facility when used, and components for the distribution of transformed energy to the extent that they cannot be used jointly with a conventional energy system. Passive solar energy systems are included in this definition but not to the extent that they fulfill other functions, such as structural or recreational.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 5.